District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0566.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may be
cited as the “Petition Administration Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The District of Columbia Election Code of 1955, approved August 12, 1955 (69
Stat. 701; D.C. Official Code § 1-1001.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 8 (D.C. Official Code 1-1001.08) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (b)(3) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and
inserting a semicolon in its place.
(B) Subparagraph (C) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “; and” in its place.
(C) A new subparagraph (D) is added to read as follows:
“(D) Not written, altered, corrected, clarified, or obscured information on the
petition about the signer of the petition after the signer affixed their signature to the petition.”.
(2) A new subsection (n-1) is added to read as follows:
“(n-1) No person other than the petition signer may write, alter, correct, or clarify, on a
nominating petition any information about the petition signer unless the signer requests assistance
in writing, altering, correcting, or clarifying on the petition, any information about the signer before
the signer affixes their signature. The use of correction tape or fluid is prohibited.”.
(b) Section 16 (D.C. Official Code § 1-1001.16) is amended as follows:
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(1) Subsection (h) is amended by adding a new paragraph (3A) to read as follows:
“(3A) That the circulator of the petition sheet has not written, altered, corrected,
clarified, or obscured information on the petition about the signer of the petition after the signer
affixed their signature to the petition;”.
(2) A new subsection (h-1) is added to read as follows:
“(h-1) No person other than the petition signer may write, alter, correct, or clarify, on a
petition sheet for an initiative or referendum unless the signer requests assistance in writing,
altering, correcting, or clarifying on the petition, any information about the petition signer before
the signer affixes their signature. The use of correction fluid or tape is prohibited.”.
(c) Section 17 (D.C. Official Code § 1-1001.17) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (f) is amended by adding a new paragraph (3A) to read as follows:
“(3A) That the circulator of the petition sheet has not written, altered, corrected,
clarified, or obscured information on the petition about the signer of the petition after the signer
affixed their signature to the petition;”.
(2) A new subsection (f-1) is added to read as follows:
“(f-1) No person other than the petition signer may write, alter, correct, or clarify, on a
petition sheet for a recall petition unless the signer requests assistance in writing, altering,
correcting, or clarifying on the petition, any information about the petition signer before the signer
affixes their signature. The use of correction fluid or tape is prohibited.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report for the Petition
Administration Clarification Amendment Act of 2026, passed on 2nd reading on January 6, 2026
(Enrolled version of Bill 26-233), as the fiscal impact statement required by section 4a of the
General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C.
Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect no longer than 90-
days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section 412(a)
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788; D.C.
Official Code § § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3